New York, session 2025-2026, A10634.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 5-322.1 of the general obligations 2 law, as added by chapter 224 of the laws of 2009, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 2. A covenant, promise, agreement or understanding in, or in 5 connection with or collateral to a contract or agreement relative to the 6 construction, alteration, repair or maintenance of a building, struc- 7 ture, appurtenances and appliances including moving, demolition and 8 excavating connected therewith, purporting to condition a subcontrac- 9 tor's or [materialman's] material supplier's right to (a) file a claim, 10 (b) commence a lawsuit or arbitration proceeding for breach of contract 11 or quantum meruit, and/or (c) commence an action on a payment bond on 12 exhaustion of another legal remedy is against public policy and is void 13 and unenforceable; provided that this subdivision shall not affect the 14 validity of any insurance contract, workers' compensation agreement or 15 other agreement issued by an admitted insurer. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 17 contracts entered into, renewed, modified or amended on or after such 18 effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15149-01-6